Hawaii statutes.
[§432F-2] Health care provider
network adequacy. (a) On or before January 1 of each calendar year, each
managed care plan shall demonstrate the adequacy of its provider network to the
commissioner. A provider network shall be considered adequate if it provides
access to sufficient numbers and types of providers to ensure that all covered
services will be accessible without unreasonable delay, after taking into
consideration geography. The commissioner shall also consider any applicable
federal standards on network adequacy. A certification from a national
accreditation organization shall create a rebuttable presumption that the
network of a managed care plan is adequate. This presumption may be rebutted
by evidence submitted to, or collected by, the commissioner.

(b) A managed care plan that does not have a
certification from a national accreditation organization may submit to the
commissioner a plan to become accredited by a national accreditation
organization within a period of two years if the managed care plan has provided
sufficient evidence that its network is reasonably adequate at the time of
submission of the plan. The commissioner shall also consider any applicable
federal standards on network adequacy. The commissioner may extend the period
of time for accreditation.

(c) The commissioner shall approve or
disapprove a managed care plan's annual filing on network adequacy. If the
commissioner deems the filing incomplete, additional information and supporting
documentation may be requested. A managed care plan shall have sixty days to
appeal an adverse decision by the commissioner in an administrative hearing
pursuant to chapter 91.

(d) To enable the commissioner to determine
the network adequacy for qualified health plans to be listed with the Hawaii health
connector under section 435H-11, the commissioner may request that a managed
care plan demonstrate the adequacy of its provider network at the time that it
files its health plan benefit document with the commissioner.

(e) This section shall apply to any managed
care plan qualified as a prepaid health care plan pursuant to chapter 393. [L
2013, c 192, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next